Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1504
Deputy registrar; neglect of duties; penalty.

Any deputy registrar who is guilty of any willful neglect of his or her duty or of any corrupt or fraudulent conduct or practice in the execution of his or her duty or who willfully neglects or, when called upon, willfully declines to exercise the powers conferred on him or her by sections 32-301 to 32-330 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 403.